test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_I_miskweyaab_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfs
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  NI - I - miskweyaab :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4	5	6	7
  #per	dim	the	pej	pos	mod	num
     
     #Isolation form
     miskweyaab: miskweyaab
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     1+miskweyaab: nimiskweyaab
     2+miskweyaab: gimiskweyaab
     3+miskweyaab: omiskweyaab
     X+miskweyaab: imiskweyaab
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     miskweyaab+NI+Con: miskweyaabiinh
     miskweyaab+NI+Dim: miskweyaabiins
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     miskweyaab+NI+Pej: miskweyaabiish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     miskweyaab+NI+Pret: miskweyaabiiban
     miskweyaab+NI+VocPl: [miskweyaabiidig, miskweyaabiidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     miskweyaab+NI+Loc: miskweyaabiing
     miskweyaab+NI+Obv: miskweyaabiin
     miskweyaab+NI+Pl: miskweyaabiin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Con: nimiskweyaabiinh
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Dim: nimiskweyaabiins
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Con: gimiskweyaabiinh
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim: gimiskweyaabiins
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con: omiskweyaabiinh
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Dim: omiskweyaabiins
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Con: imiskweyaabiinh
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Dim: imiskweyaabiins
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Pos: nimiskweyaabiim
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pos: gimiskweyaabiim
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pos: omiskweyaabiim
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Pos: imiskweyaabiim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Pej: nimiskweyaabiish
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pej: gimiskweyaabiish
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pej: omiskweyaabiish
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Pej: imiskweyaabiish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     1+miskweyaab+NI+1Pl: nimiskweyaabiinaan
     2+miskweyaab+NI+21: gimiskweyaabiinaan
     2+miskweyaab+NI+2Pl: gimiskweyaabiiwaa
     3+miskweyaab+NI+3Obv: omiskweyaabiini
     3+miskweyaab+NI+3Pl: omiskweyaabiiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Pret: nimiskweyaabiiban
     1+miskweyaab+NI+VocPl: [nimiskweyaabiidig, nimiskweyaabiidog]
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pret: gimiskweyaabiiban
     2+miskweyaab+NI+VocPl: [gimiskweyaabiidig, gimiskweyaabiidog]
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pret: omiskweyaabiiban
     3+miskweyaab+NI+VocPl: [omiskweyaabiidig, omiskweyaabiidog]
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Pret: imiskweyaabiiban
     X+miskweyaab+NI+VocPl: [imiskweyaabiidig, imiskweyaabiidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Loc: nimiskweyaabiing
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Obv: nimiskweyaabiin
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Pl: nimiskweyaabiin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Loc: gimiskweyaabiing
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Obv: gimiskweyaabiin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pl: gimiskweyaabiin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Loc: omiskweyaabiing
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Obv: omiskweyaabiin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pl: omiskweyaabiin
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Loc: imiskweyaabiing
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Obv: imiskweyaabiin
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Pl: imiskweyaabiin
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pej: miskweyaabiinyish
     miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pej: miskweyaabiinsish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pret: miskweyaabiinyiban
     miskweyaab+NI+Con+VocPl: [miskweyaabiinyidig, miskweyaabiinyidog]
     miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pret: miskweyaabiinsiban
     miskweyaab+NI+Dim+VocPl: [miskweyaabiinsidig, miskweyaabiinsidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     miskweyaab+NI+Con+Loc: miskweyaabiinying
     miskweyaab+NI+Con+Obv: miskweyaabiinyin
     miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pl: miskweyaabiinyin
     miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Loc: miskweyaabiinsing
     miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Obv: miskweyaabiinsan
     miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pl: miskweyaabiinsan
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     miskweyaab+NI+Pej+Pret: miskweyaabiishiban
     miskweyaab+NI+Pej+VocPl: [miskweyaabiishidig, miskweyaabiishidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     miskweyaab+NI+Pej+Loc: miskweyaabiishing
     miskweyaab+NI+Pej+Obv: miskweyaabiishan
     miskweyaab+NI+Pej+Pl: miskweyaabiishan
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     miskweyaab+NI+Pret+Loc: miskweyaabiibaniing
     miskweyaab+NI+Pret+Obv: miskweyaabiibaniin
     miskweyaab+NI+Pret+Pl: miskweyaabiibaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos: nimiskweyaabiinyim
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos: nimiskweyaabiinsim
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos: gimiskweyaabiinyim
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos: gimiskweyaabiinsim
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos: omiskweyaabiinyim
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos: omiskweyaabiinsim
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos: imiskweyaabiinyim
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos: imiskweyaabiinsim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pej: nimiskweyaabiinyish
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pej: nimiskweyaabiinsish
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pej: gimiskweyaabiinyish
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pej: gimiskweyaabiinsish
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pej: omiskweyaabiinyish
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pej: omiskweyaabiinsish
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pej: imiskweyaabiinyish
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pej: imiskweyaabiinsish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Con+1Pl: nimiskweyaabiinyinaan
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+1Pl: nimiskweyaabiinsinaan
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Con+21: gimiskweyaabiinyinaan
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Con+2Pl: gimiskweyaabiinyiwaa
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+21: gimiskweyaabiinsinaan
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+2Pl: gimiskweyaabiinsiwaa
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+3Obv: omiskweyaabiinyini
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+3Pl: omiskweyaabiinyiwaa
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+3Obv: omiskweyaabiinsini
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+3Pl: omiskweyaabiinsiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pret: nimiskweyaabiinyiban
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Con+VocPl: [nimiskweyaabiinyidig, nimiskweyaabiinyidog]
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pret: nimiskweyaabiinsiban
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+VocPl: [nimiskweyaabiinsidig, nimiskweyaabiinsidog]
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pret: gimiskweyaabiinyiban
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Con+VocPl: [gimiskweyaabiinyidig, gimiskweyaabiinyidog]
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pret: gimiskweyaabiinsiban
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+VocPl: [gimiskweyaabiinsidig, gimiskweyaabiinsidog]
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pret: omiskweyaabiinyiban
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+VocPl: [omiskweyaabiinyidig, omiskweyaabiinyidog]
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pret: omiskweyaabiinsiban
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+VocPl: [omiskweyaabiinsidig, omiskweyaabiinsidog]
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pret: imiskweyaabiinyiban
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Con+VocPl: [imiskweyaabiinyidig, imiskweyaabiinyidog]
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pret: imiskweyaabiinsiban
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+VocPl: [imiskweyaabiinsidig, imiskweyaabiinsidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Loc: nimiskweyaabiinying
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Obv: nimiskweyaabiinyin
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pl: nimiskweyaabiinyin
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Loc: nimiskweyaabiinsing
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Obv: nimiskweyaabiinsan
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pl: nimiskweyaabiinsan
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Loc: gimiskweyaabiinying
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Obv: gimiskweyaabiinyin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pl: gimiskweyaabiinyin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Loc: gimiskweyaabiinsing
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Obv: gimiskweyaabiinsan
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pl: gimiskweyaabiinsan
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Loc: omiskweyaabiinying
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Obv: omiskweyaabiinyin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pl: omiskweyaabiinyin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Loc: omiskweyaabiinsing
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Obv: omiskweyaabiinsan
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pl: omiskweyaabiinsan
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Loc: imiskweyaabiinying
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Obv: imiskweyaabiinyin
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pl: imiskweyaabiinyin
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Loc: imiskweyaabiinsing
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Obv: imiskweyaabiinsan
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pl: imiskweyaabiinsan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pej: nimiskweyaabiimish
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pej: gimiskweyaabiimish
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pej: omiskweyaabiimish
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pej: imiskweyaabiimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+1Pl: nimiskweyaabiiminaan
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+21: gimiskweyaabiiminaan
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+2Pl: gimiskweyaabiimiwaa
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+3Obv: omiskweyaabiimini
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+3Pl: omiskweyaabiimiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pret: nimiskweyaabiimiban
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+VocPl: [nimiskweyaabiimidig, nimiskweyaabiimidog]
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pret: gimiskweyaabiimiban
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+VocPl: [gimiskweyaabiimidig, gimiskweyaabiimidog]
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pret: omiskweyaabiimiban
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+VocPl: [omiskweyaabiimidig, omiskweyaabiimidog]
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pret: imiskweyaabiimiban
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+VocPl: [imiskweyaabiimidig, imiskweyaabiimidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Loc: nimiskweyaabiiming
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Obv: nimiskweyaabiiman
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pl: nimiskweyaabiiman
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Loc: gimiskweyaabiiming
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Obv: gimiskweyaabiiman
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pl: gimiskweyaabiiman
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Loc: omiskweyaabiiming
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Obv: omiskweyaabiiman
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pl: omiskweyaabiiman
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Loc: imiskweyaabiiming
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Obv: imiskweyaabiiman
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pl: imiskweyaabiiman
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+1Pl: nimiskweyaabiishinaan
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+21: gimiskweyaabiishinaan
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+2Pl: gimiskweyaabiishiwaa
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+3Obv: omiskweyaabiishini
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+3Pl: omiskweyaabiishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+Pret: nimiskweyaabiishiban
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+VocPl: [nimiskweyaabiishidig, nimiskweyaabiishidog]
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+Pret: gimiskweyaabiishiban
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+VocPl: [gimiskweyaabiishidig, gimiskweyaabiishidog]
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+Pret: omiskweyaabiishiban
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+VocPl: [omiskweyaabiishidig, omiskweyaabiishidog]
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+Pret: imiskweyaabiishiban
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+VocPl: [imiskweyaabiishidig, imiskweyaabiishidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 7
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+Loc: nimiskweyaabiishing
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+Obv: nimiskweyaabiishan
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+Pl: nimiskweyaabiishan
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+Loc: gimiskweyaabiishing
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+Obv: gimiskweyaabiishan
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+Pl: gimiskweyaabiishan
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+Loc: omiskweyaabiishing
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+Obv: omiskweyaabiishan
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+Pl: omiskweyaabiishan
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+Loc: imiskweyaabiishing
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+Obv: imiskweyaabiishan
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+Pl: imiskweyaabiishan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6
     1+miskweyaab+NI+1Pl+Pret: nimiskweyaabiinaaniban
     1+miskweyaab+NI+1Pl+VocPl: [nimiskweyaabiinaanidig, nimiskweyaabiinaanidog]
     2+miskweyaab+NI+21+Pret: gimiskweyaabiinaaniban
     2+miskweyaab+NI+21+VocPl: [gimiskweyaabiinaanidig, gimiskweyaabiinaanidog]
     2+miskweyaab+NI+2Pl+Pret: gimiskweyaabiiwaaban
     2+miskweyaab+NI+2Pl+VocPl: [gimiskweyaabiiwaadig, gimiskweyaabiiwaadog]
     3+miskweyaab+NI+3Obv+Pret: omiskweyaabiiniiban
     3+miskweyaab+NI+3Obv+VocPl: [omiskweyaabiiniidig, omiskweyaabiiniidog]
